Utah statutes.
22-3-301.   When right to income begins and ends.
(1)  An income beneficiary is entitled to net income from the date on which
the income interest begins.  An income interest begins on the date specified
in the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the date an asset
becomes subject to a trust or successive income interest.
(2)  An asset becomes subject to a trust:
(a)  on the date it is transferred to the trust in the case of an asset that
is transferred to a trust during the transferor's life;
(b)  on the date of a testator's death in the case of an asset that becomes
subject to a trust by reason of a will, even if there is an intervening period
of administration of the testator's estate; or
(c)  on the date of an individual's death in the case of an asset that is
transferred to a fiduciary by a third party because of the individual's death.
(3)  An asset becomes subject to a successive income interest on the day after
the preceding income interest ends, as determined under Subsection (4), even
if there is an intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding
income interest.
(4)  An income interest ends on the day before an income beneficiary dies or
another terminating event occurs, or on the last day of a period during which
there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may distribute income.
